Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Advertising Adjacent to the Natchez Trace Parkway

§ 55-13-33.
Restrictions on proximity of advertising to Natchez Trace Parkway.

No advertisement or advertising structure shall be erected, constructed, installed, maintained or operated within one thousand (1,000) feet of the outside boundary of the Natchez Trace Parkway outside the limits of any municipality except as follows:

Signs, displays or devices which advertise sale, lease, rental or development of the property on which it is located;

Signs, displays or devices which carry only advertisements strictly related to the lawful use of the property on which it is located including signs, displays and devices which identify the business transacted, services rendered, goods sold or produced on the property, name of the business or name of the person, firm or corporation occupying or owning the property. The size of signs advertising the major activity of a business is not regulated under Sections 55-13-33 through 55-13-45. Signs which advertise brand name products or service sold or offered for sale on the property shall not be displayed unless such signs are on or attached to the building in which such products are sold. All signs permitted under this subsection shall be located not more than one hundred fifty (150) feet from the building in which such business activity is carried on;

Historic markers erected by duly constituted and authorized public authorities;

Highway markers and signs erected or caused to be erected by the Mississippi State Highway Department or other authorized authorities in accordance with the law;

Directional and official signs or notices erected and maintained by public officers or agencies pursuant to and in accordance with lawful authorization for the purpose of carrying out an official duty or responsibility;

Except as otherwise provided by law, signs located within a one thousand (1,000) foot radius of intersections created by the crossing of the boundary of the Natchez Trace Parkway with the right-of-way lines of components of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, the Federal Aid Primary Highway System or the Mississippi System of Primary Highways.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 587, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 55-13-35.
Restrictions on height of buildings adjacent to Natchez Trace Parkway; exemptions.

It shall be unlawful to construct or erect a building, advertising structure or other structure, of more than three (3) stories or thirty-five (35) feet in height, whichever is lesser, within one thousand (1,000) feet of the outside boundary of the Natchez Trace Parkway. Such restrictions on buildings and structures shall apply notwithstanding that such area is located inside or outside a municipality and notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary.

It is the legislative intent of this section, in part, that possession of a building permit on July 1, 1988, shall not allow any construction after July 1, 1988, based on that permit. This section shall not apply to any building in existence on July 1, 1988.

The following buildings or structures are exempt from the application of this section if they were constructed or under construction prior to July 1, 2002:

Silos, buildings and structures designed for agricultural use;

Churches; and

Any building or structure on property that is owned by a public school district and used for educational purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 587, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 356, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 545, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 531, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 55-13-37.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The Mississippi Highway Commission shall have authority to make and promulgate rules and regulations necessary for carrying out the provisions of Sections 55-13-33 through 55-13-45.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 587, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 55-13-39.
Maintenance of preexisting nonconforming advertising or structures; acquisition, purchase or condemnation of preexisting advertisement or structure.

Any advertisement or advertising structure in existence on July 1, 1988, and which does not conform to the requirements of Sections 55-13-33 through 55-13-45 may be maintained for the life of such advertisement or advertising structure, provided that the State Highway Department may acquire by purchase, gift or condemnation all such advertisements and advertising structures and all property rights pertaining thereto. All condemnation proceedings shall be in accordance with such procedure as generally established by law.

In any acquisition, purchase or condemnation by the State Highway Department under subsection (1) of this section, just compensation to the owner of the advertisement or advertising or advertising structure, where the owner of the outdoor advertising does not own the fee, shall be limited to the fair market value at the time of the taking of the advertising owner’s interest in the real property on which the outdoor advertising is located and such value shall include the value of the advertising.

In any acquisition, purchase or condemnation by the State Highway Department under subsection (1) of this section, just compensation to the owner of the fee or other interest in the real property upon which the advertising is located, where the owner does not own the advertising located thereon, shall be limited to the difference in the fair market value of the entire tract immediately before and immediately after the taking by the department of the right to erect and maintain such advertising thereon. In arriving at the fair market value after the taking, any special or general benefits accruing to the property by reason of the acquisition shall be taken into consideration.

In any acquisition, purchase or condemnation by the State Highway Department under subsection (1) of this section, just compensation to the owner of the fee in the real property upon which the advertising is located, where the owner also owns the advertising located thereon, shall be limited to the fair market value of the advertising plus the difference in the fair market value of the entire tract immediately before and immediately after the taking by the State Highway Department of the right to erect and maintain such advertising thereon. In arriving at the fair market value after the taking, any special or general benefits accruing to the property by reason of the acquisition shall be taken into consideration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 587, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 55-13-41.
Removal, etc., of nonconforming advertising.

Any advertising erected or established after July 1, 1988, in violation of the provisions of Sections 55-13-33 through 55-13-45, shall be unlawful and shall constitute a nuisance. The State Highway Department shall give thirty (30) days’ notice by certified mail to the owner of the nonconforming advertising, if such owner is known or can by reasonable diligence be ascertained, to remove the advertising or to make it conform to the provisions of Sections 55-13-33 through 55-13-45 and any rules and regulations promulgated by the State Highway Department pursuant thereto. The State Highway Department shall have the right to remove or contract to have removed the nonconforming advertising at the expense of the owner if the owner fails to act within thirty (30) days after receipt of such notice. The State Highway Department or its agents or any person contracting with the department may enter upon private property for the purpose of removing advertising prohibited by Sections 55-13-33 through 55-13-45 or any rules and regulations promulgated by the State Highway Department without civil or criminal liability.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 587, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 55-13-43.
Penalties for violation of Sections 55-13-33 through 55-13-45 and rules and regulations; injunctions.

Any person, firm, corporation or association placing or erecting any advertisements or advertising structures or any junkyard along the Natchez Trace Parkway in violation of Sections 55-13-33 through 55-13-45 or any rule or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. In addition thereto, the State Highway Department may seek injunctive relief in the chancery court of the county in which the nonconforming advertising is located and require the advertising to conform to the provisions of Sections 55-13-33 through 55-13-45 and rules and regulations promulgated pursuant hereto, or require the removal of the nonconforming outdoor advertising.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 587, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 55-13-45.
Study on use of uniform informational signs.

The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to conduct investigations, including but not limited to necessary consultations with the National Park Service, to study the feasibility of the use of uniform informational signs along the parkways or parks which relate to commercial establishments accessible from the parkways or parks, and to report back to the 1989 Session of the Mississippi Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 587, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1988.